Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Close supervision of a dentist" means that a supervising dentist:

(a) Has personally examined and diagnosed the patient and has personally authorized the procedures to be performed;

(b) Is continuously on-site while the procedure in question is being performed; and

(c) Is capable of responding immediately in the event of an emergency.

(2) "Commission" means the dental quality assurance commission established in chapter 18.32 RCW.

(3) "Dental therapist" means a person licensed to practice dental therapy under this chapter.

(4) "Dental therapy" means the services and procedures specified in RCW 18.265.050.

(5) "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW or exempt from such licensure pursuant to Title 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1621t of the Indian health care improvement act.

(6) "Denturist" means a person licensed to engage in the practice of denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW.

(7) "Department" means the department of health.

(8) "Off-site supervision" means supervision that does not require the dentist to be personally on-site when services are provided or to previously examine or diagnose the patient.

(9) "Practice plan contract" means a document that is signed by a dentist and a dental therapist and outlines the functions the dentist authorizes the dental therapist to perform and the level and type of dentist supervision that is required.

(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 2023 c 460 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.